West Virginia, session 2026, HB4317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for Miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Psychologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-21-6 of this code, modified by the Psychologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 19, 2025, relating to the Psychologists (requirements for licensure as a psychologist or a school psychologist, 17 CSR 03), is authorized.